Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Article 2.4. Erosion and Sediment Control Law.

Editor’s note.

This article head has been amended by 2016, cc. 68 and 758 to read “Erosion and Sediment Control Law for Localities Not Administering a Virginia Erosion and Stormwater Management Program” effective on July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later.

§ 62.1-44.15:51.
(For expiration date — see notes) Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Agreement in lieu of a plan”
means a contract between the plan-approving authority and the owner that specifies conservation measures that must be implemented in the construction of a single-family residence; this contract may be executed by the plan-approving authority in lieu of a formal site plan.

“Applicant”
means any person submitting an erosion and sediment control plan for approval or requesting the issuance of a permit, when required, authorizing land-disturbing activities to commence.

“Certified inspector”
means an employee or agent of a VESCP authority who (i) holds a certificate of competence from the Board in the area of project inspection or (ii) is enrolled in the Board’s training program for project inspection and successfully completes such program within one year after enrollment.

“Certified plan reviewer”
means an employee or agent of a VESCP authority who (i) holds a certificate of competence from the Board in the area of plan review, (ii) is enrolled in the Board’s training program for plan review and successfully completes such program within one year after enrollment, or (iii) is licensed as a professional engineer, architect, landscape architect, land surveyor pursuant to Article 1 (§

54.1-400

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 54.1, or professional soil scientist as defined in §

54.1-2200

.

“Certified program administrator”
means an employee or agent of a VESCP authority who (i) holds a certificate of competence from the Board in the area of program administration or (ii) is enrolled in the Board’s training program for program administration and successfully completes such program within one year after enrollment.

“Department”
means the Department of Environmental Quality.

“Director”
means the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality.

“District”
or

“soil and water conservation district”

means a political subdivision of the Commonwealth organized in accordance with the provisions of Article 3 (§ 10.1-506 et seq.) of Chapter 5 of Title 10.1.

“Erosion and sediment control plan”
or

“plan”

means a document containing material for the conservation of soil and water resources of a unit or group of units of land. It may include appropriate maps, an appropriate soil and water plan inventory and management information with needed interpretations, and a record of decisions contributing to conservation treatment. The plan shall contain all major conservation decisions to ensure that the entire unit or units of land will be so treated to achieve the conservation objectives.

“Erosion impact area”
means an area of land not associated with current land-disturbing activity but subject to persistent soil erosion resulting in the delivery of sediment onto neighboring properties or into state waters. This definition shall not apply to any lot or parcel of land of 10,000 square feet or less used for residential purposes or to shorelines where the erosion results from wave action or other coastal processes.

“Land-disturbing activity”
means any man-made change to the land surface that may result in soil erosion from water or wind and the movement of sediments into state waters or onto lands in the Commonwealth, including, but not limited to, clearing, grading, excavating, transporting, and filling of land, except that the term shall not include:

Minor land-disturbing activities such as home gardens and individual home landscaping, repairs, and maintenance work;

Individual service connections;

Installation, maintenance, or repair of any underground public utility lines when such activity occurs on an existing hard surfaced road, street, or sidewalk, provided the land-disturbing activity is confined to the area of the road, street, or sidewalk that is hard surfaced;

Septic tank lines or drainage fields unless included in an overall plan for land-disturbing activity relating to construction of the building to be served by the septic tank system;

Permitted surface or deep mining operations and projects, or oil and gas operations and projects conducted pursuant to Title 45.2;

Tilling, planting, or harvesting of agricultural, horticultural, or forest crops, livestock feedlot operations, or as additionally set forth by the Board in regulation, including engineering operations as follows: construction of terraces, terrace outlets, check dams, desilting basins, dikes, ponds, ditches, strip cropping, lister furrowing, contour cultivating, contour furrowing, land drainage, and land irrigation; however, this exception shall not apply to harvesting of forest crops unless the area on which harvesting occurs is reforested artificially or naturally in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 11 (§ 10.1-1100 et seq.) of Title 10.1 or is converted to bona fide agricultural or improved pasture use as described in subsection B of § 10.1-1163;

Repair or rebuilding of the tracks, rights-of-way, bridges, communication facilities, and other related structures and facilities of a railroad company;

Agricultural engineering operations, including but not limited to the construction of terraces, terrace outlets, check dams, desilting basins, dikes, ponds not required to comply with the provisions of the Dam Safety Act (§ 10.1-604 et seq.), ditches, strip cropping, lister furrowing, contour cultivating, contour furrowing, land drainage, and land irrigation;

Disturbed land areas of less than 10,000 square feet in size or 2,500 square feet in all areas of the jurisdictions designated as subject to the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Area Designation and Management Regulations; however, the governing body of the program authority may reduce this exception to a smaller area of disturbed land or qualify the conditions under which this exception shall apply;

Installation of fence and sign posts or telephone and electric poles and other kinds of posts or poles;

Shoreline erosion control projects on tidal waters when all of the land-disturbing activities are within the regulatory authority of and approved by local wetlands boards, the Marine Resources Commission, or the United States Army Corps of Engineers; however, any associated land that is disturbed outside of this exempted area shall remain subject to this article and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto; and

Emergency work to protect life, limb, or property, and emergency repairs; however, if the land-disturbing activity would have required an approved erosion and sediment control plan, if the activity were not an emergency, then the land area disturbed shall be shaped and stabilized in accordance with the requirements of the VESCP authority.

“Natural channel design concepts”
means the utilization of engineering analysis and fluvial geomorphic processes to create, rehabilitate, restore, or stabilize an open conveyance system for the purpose of creating or recreating a stream that conveys its bankfull storm event within its banks and allows larger flows to access its bankfull bench and its floodplain.

“Owner”
means the owner or owners of the freehold of the premises or lesser estate therein, mortgagee or vendee in possession, assignee of rents, receiver, executor, trustee, lessee, or other person, firm, or corporation in control of a property.

“Peak flow rate”
means the maximum instantaneous flow from a given storm condition at a particular location.

“Permittee”
means the person to whom the local permit authorizing land-disturbing activities is issued or the person who certifies that the approved erosion and sediment control plan will be followed.

“Person”
means any individual, partnership, firm, association, joint venture, public or private corporation, trust, estate, commission, board, public or private institution, utility, cooperative, county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the Commonwealth, governmental body, including a federal or state entity as applicable, any interstate body, or any other legal entity.

“Runoff volume”
means the volume of water that runs off the land development project from a prescribed storm event.

“Town”
means an incorporated town.

“Virginia Erosion and Sediment Control Program”
or

“VESCP”

means a program approved by the Board that has been established by a VESCP authority for the effective control of soil erosion, sediment deposition, and nonagricultural runoff associated with a land-disturbing activity to prevent the unreasonable degradation of properties, stream channels, waters, and other natural resources and shall include such items where applicable as local ordinances, rules, permit requirements, annual standards and specifications, policies and guidelines, technical materials, and requirements for plan review, inspection, enforcement where authorized in this article, and evaluation consistent with the requirements of this article and its associated regulations.

“Virginia Erosion and Sediment Control Program authority”
or

“VESCP authority”

means an authority approved by the Board to operate a Virginia Erosion and Sediment Control Program. An authority may include a state entity, including the Department; a federal entity; a district, county, city, or town; or for linear projects subject to annual standards and specifications, electric, natural gas, and telephone utility companies, interstate and intrastate natural gas pipeline companies, railroad companies, or authorities created pursuant to §

15.2-5102

.

“Water quality volume”
means the volume equal to the first one-half inch of runoff multiplied by the impervious surface of the land development project.

History.

1973, c. 486, § 21-89.3; 1974, c. 265; 1977, c. 149; 1980, c. 305; 1988, cc. 690, 732, 891, § 10.1-560; 1990, c. 491; 1991, c. 469; 1992, c. 184; 1993, c. 925; 1994, c. 703; 2003, c. 423; 2004, c. 476; 2005, c. 107; 2006, c. 21; 2009, c. 309; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9. For this section as in effect at that time, see the following section, also numbered

62.1-44.15:51

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, recodified Article 4 ( § 10.1-560 et seq.) of Chapter 5 of Title 10.1, as Article 2.4 ( §

62.1-44.15:51

et seq.) of Chapter 3.1 of Title 62.1. In addition to revision by Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, Article 4 was also amended by other acts passed at the 2013 Session. As required by
§ 30-152, the Code Commission has incorporated the majority of these amendments into the new sections. Where appropriate, the historical citations to former sections have been added to corresponding new sections. Furthermore, annotations appearing under new
sections were decided under corresponding former sections or under prior law where relevant. For tables of corresponding former and new sections, see the tables in Volume 10.

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 5 provides: “That the transfer of the responsibility for administering the issuance and enforcement of national pollutant discharge elimination system permits for the control of stormwater discharges shall become effective on July 1, 2013, or upon the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s rescission of authorization for delegation of program authority to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, whichever occurs later.” Pursuant to a letter received from the Environmental Protection Agency on July 2, 2013, the transfer of responsibility from DCR to DEQ has been approved as required by this provision.

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 6 provides: “Regulations of the regulatory boards served by (i) the Department of Labor and Industry pursuant to Title 40.1 and (ii) the Department of Professional and Occupational Regulation or the Department of Health Professions pursuant to Title 54.1 that are limited to reducing fees charged to regulants and applicants.”

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 7 provides: “That the regulations adopted by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board to administer and implement the Virginia Stormwater Management Act ( § 10.1-603.1 et seq. of the Code of Virginia), the Erosion and Sediment Control Law (§ 10.1- 560 et seq. of the Code of Virginia), and the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§ 10.1- 2100 et seq. of the Code of Virginia) are transferred from the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board to the State Water Control Board, and the State Water Control Board may amend, modify, or delete provisions in these regulations in order to implement this act. Such regulations shall remain in full force and effect until altered, amended, or rescinded by the State Water Control Board.”

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 8 provides: “That the initial actions of the State Water Control Board to adopt, with necessary amendments, the regulations implementing the programs being transferred by this act from the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board to the State Water Control Board shall be exempt from Article 2 ( §

2.2-4006

et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia. After transfer of the programs, if the State Water Control Board determines that additional amendments to the regulations are necessary solely to enable implementation of the programs in accordance with this act, the regulatory actions necessary shall be exempt from Article 2 ( §

2.2-4006

et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, except that the Department of Environmental Quality shall provide an opportunity for public comment on the regulatory actions.”

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 9 provides: “That any regulatory action initiated by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board to amend the programs being transferred by this act may be continued by the State Water Control Board at the time of the program transfer and that the State Water Control Board shall act expeditiously to address all such actions.”

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 10 provides: “That the full-time employees and the total maximum employment level employed in the administration of the programs being transferred by this act shall be transferred from the Department of Conservation and Recreation to the Department of Environmental Quality. The Department of Conservation and Recreation is directed to transfer to the Department of Environmental Quality all appropriations, including special funds, for programs identified for transfer by this act. The Department of Environmental Quality is authorized to hire additional staff to operate the programs transferred by this act.”

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 11 provides: “That 30 days prior to (i) the transfer of any full-time employees and total maximum employment level employed in the administration of the programs being transferred by this act, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall report to the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Finance, the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, the House Committee on Appropriations, and the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources on such transfers and (ii) the transfer of appropriations, including special funds, for programs identified for transfer in this act, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall report on such transfers. By December 1, 2013, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall also report on the process by which the Department of Environmental Quality will distribute funds to local soil and water conservation districts as provided for in § 319 of the federal Clean Water Act and § 6217 of the federal Coastal Zone Management Act.”

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 12 provides: “That the Directors of the Departments of Environmental Quality and Conservation and Recreation, the Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services, and members of the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources and the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, appointed by their respective Chairs, shall convene public meetings throughout the Commonwealth to evaluate the role of soil and water conservation districts in providing effective delivery of water quality services and technical assistance. In their deliberations the representatives of the executive branch agencies and legislators shall:

“A. Discuss the provisions of this act and its implications and solicit comments from the public and affected parties;

“B. Determine the extent of the role soil and water conservation districts should play in providing assistance in delivery of water quality services for nonpoint source pollution management and providing technical assistance for such programs as erosion and sediment control and stormwater management; and

“C. Determine whether the mission of soil and water conservation districts is more effectively delivered under the current statutory framework or whether organizational changes would enhance the effectiveness and efficiency of the delivery of such services.”

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 13 provides: “That guidance of the Department of Conservation and Recreation, the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, and the former Chesapeake Bay Local Assistance Board relating to programs to be transferred by this act shall remain in effect until amended or repealed.”

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 14 provides: “That the Secretary of Natural Resources, working with the Directors of the Departments of Environmental Quality and Conservation and Recreation, shall take steps to enhance collaboration and communication among the natural resources agencies to ensure the effective and efficient implementation of the Commonwealth’s water quality and soil and water conservation programs.”

Effective October 1, 2021, “Title 45.2” was substituted for “Title 45.1” to conform to the recodification of Title 45.1 by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Law Review.

For 2003/2004 survey of environmental law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 203 (2004).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Stop work orders. —

Subsection C of § 10.1-566 provides for two distinct orders that may be issued to compel compliance with permit and plan approval requirements: (1) an initial order that applies only to land disturbing activities; and (2) a more restrictive second order encompassing all construction activities that may be issued for noncompliance with the first order. Further, building official lacks the authority to limit the scope of the second order once it is issued. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable James E. Edmunds, II, Member, House of Delegates, 10-052, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 39 (7/30/10).

§ 62.1-44.15:51.
(For effective date — see notes) Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Agreement in lieu of a plan”
means a contract between the VESCP authority and the owner that specifies conservation measures that must be implemented in the construction of a single-family detached residential structure; this contract may be executed by the VESCP authority in lieu of a formal site plan.

“Applicant”
means any person submitting an erosion and sediment control plan for approval in order to obtain authorization for land-disturbing activities to commence.

“Certified inspector”
means an employee or agent of a VESCP authority who (i) holds a certification from the Board in the area of project inspection or (ii) is enrolled in the Board’s training program for project inspection and successfully completes such program within one year after enrollment.

“Certified plan reviewer”
means an employee or agent of a VESCP authority who (i) holds a certification from the Board in the area of plan review, (ii) is enrolled in the Board’s training program for plan review and successfully completes such program within one year after enrollment, or (iii) is licensed as a professional engineer, architect, landscape architect, land surveyor pursuant to Article 1 (§

54.1-400

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 54.1, or professional soil scientist as defined in §

54.1-2200

.

“Certified program administrator”
means an employee or agent of a VESCP authority who (i) holds a certification from the Board in the area of program administration or (ii) is enrolled in the Board’s training program for program administration and successfully completes such program within one year after enrollment.

“Department”
means the Department of Environmental Quality.

“Director”
means the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality.

“District”
or

“soil and water conservation district”

means a political subdivision of the Commonwealth organized in accordance with the provisions of Article 3 (§ 10.1-506 et seq.) of Chapter 5 of Title 10.1.

“Erosion and sediment control plan”
or

“plan”

means a document containing material for the conservation of soil and water resources of a unit or group of units of land. It may include appropriate maps, an appropriate soil and water plan inventory and management information with needed interpretations, and a record of decisions contributing to conservation treatment. The plan shall contain all major conservation decisions to ensure that the entire unit or units of land will be so treated to achieve the conservation objectives.

“Erosion impact area”
means an area of land that is not associated with a current land-disturbing activity but is subject to persistent soil erosion resulting in the delivery of sediment onto neighboring properties or into state waters. This definition shall not apply to any lot or parcel of land of 10,000 square feet or less used for residential purposes or to shorelines where the erosion results from wave action or other coastal processes.

“Land disturbance”
or

“land-disturbing activity”

means any man-made change to the land surface that may result in soil erosion or has the potential to change its runoff characteristics, including the clearing, grading, excavating, transporting, and filling of land.

“Natural channel design concepts”
means the utilization of engineering analysis and fluvial geomorphic processes to create, rehabilitate, restore, or stabilize an open conveyance system for the purpose of creating or recreating a stream that conveys its bankfull storm event within its banks and allows larger flows to access its bankfull bench and its floodplain.

“Owner”
means the same as provided in §

62.1-44.3

. For a land-disturbing activity that is regulated under this article, “owner” also includes the owner or owners of the freehold of the premises or lesser estate therein, mortgagee or vendee in possession, assignee of rents, receiver, executor, trustee, lessee, or other person, firm, or corporation in control of a property.

“Peak flow rate”
means the maximum instantaneous flow from a given storm condition at a particular location.

“Person”
means any individual, partnership, firm, association, joint venture, public or private corporation, trust, estate, commission, board, public or private institution, utility, cooperative, county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the Commonwealth, governmental body, including a federal or state entity as applicable, any interstate body, or any other legal entity.

“Runoff volume”
means the volume of water that runs off the land development project from a prescribed storm event.

“Soil erosion”
means the movement of soil by wind or water into state waters or onto lands in the Commonwealth.

“Town”
means an incorporated town.

“Virginia Erosion and Sediment Control Program”
or

“VESCP”

means a program approved by the Board that has been established by a VESCP authority for the effective control of soil erosion, sediment deposition, and nonagricultural runoff associated with a land-disturbing activity to prevent the unreasonable degradation of properties, stream channels, waters, and other natural resources and shall include such items where applicable as local ordinances, rules, policies and guidelines, technical materials, and requirements for plan review, inspection, and evaluation consistent with the requirements of this article.

“Virginia Erosion and Sediment Control Program authority”
or

“VESCP authority”

means a locality approved by the Board to operate a Virginia Erosion and Sediment Control Program. A locality that has chosen not to establish a Virginia Erosion and Stormwater Management Program pursuant to subdivision B 3 of §

62.1-44.15:27

is required to become a VESCP authority in accordance with this article.

“Virginia Stormwater Management Program”
or

“VSMP”

means a program established by the Board pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:27.1

on behalf of a locality on or after July 1, 2014, to manage the quality and quantity of runoff resulting from any land-disturbing activity that (i) disturbs one acre or more of land or (ii) disturbs less than one acre of land and is part of a larger common plan of development or sale that results in one acre or greater of land disturbance.

History.

1973, c. 486, § 21-89.3; 1974, c. 265; 1977, c. 149; 1980, c. 305; 1988, cc. 690, 732, 891, § 10.1-560; 1990, c. 491; 1991, c. 469; 1992, c. 184; 1993, c. 925; 1994, c. 703; 2003, c. 423; 2004, c. 476; 2005, c. 107; 2006, c. 21; 2009, c. 309; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2016, cc. 68, 758.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9. For this section as in effect until that time, see the preceding section, also numbered

62.1-44.15:51

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 ( §

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act ( §

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts
2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 68 and 758 are identical, and rewrote the section. For effective date, see Editor’s note.

§ 62.1-44.15:51.1.
(For effective date — see notes) Applicability.

The requirements of this article shall apply in any locality that has chosen not to establish a Virginia Erosion and Stormwater Management Program (VESMP) pursuant to subdivision B 3 of §

62.1-44.15:27

. Each such locality shall be required to adopt and administer a Board-approved VESCP.

History.

2016, cc. 68, 758.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

§ 62.1-44.15:52.
(For expiration date — see notes) Virginia Erosion and Sediment Control Program.

The Board shall develop a program and adopt regulations in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) for the effective control of soil erosion, sediment deposition, and nonagricultural runoff that shall be met in any control program to prevent the unreasonable degradation of properties, stream channels, waters, and other natural resources. Stream restoration and relocation projects that incorporate natural channel design concepts are not man-made channels and shall be exempt from any flow rate capacity and velocity requirements for natural or man-made channels as defined in any regulations promulgated pursuant to this section or §

62.1-44.15:54

or

62.1-44.15:65

. Any plan approved prior to July 1, 2014, that provides for stormwater management that addresses any flow rate capacity and velocity requirements for natural or man-made channels shall satisfy the flow rate capacity and velocity requirements for natural or man-made channels if the practices are designed to (i) detain the water quality volume and to release it over 48 hours; (ii) detain and release over a 24-hour period the expected rainfall resulting from the one-year, 24-hour storm; and (iii) reduce the allowable peak flow rate resulting from the 1.5-year, two-year, and 10-year, 24-hour storms to a level that is less than or equal to the peak flow rate from the site assuming it was in a good forested condition, achieved through multiplication of the forested peak flow rate by a reduction factor that is equal to the runoff volume from the site when it was in a good forested condition divided by the runoff volume from the site in its proposed condition, and shall be exempt from any flow rate capacity and velocity requirement for natural or man-made channels as defined in regulations promulgated pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:54

or

62.1-44.15:65

. For plans approved on and after July 1, 2014, the flow rate capacity and velocity requirements of this subsection shall be satisfied by compliance with water quantity requirements in the Stormwater Management Act (§

62.1-44.15:24

et seq.) and attendant regulations, unless such land-disturbing activities (a) are in accordance with the grandfathering or time limits on applicability of approved design criteria provisions of the Virginia Stormwater Management Program (VSMP) Regulations, in which case the flow rate capacity and velocity requirements of this subsection shall apply, or (b) are exempt pursuant to subdivision C 7 of §

62.1-44.15:34

.The regulations shall:

Be based upon relevant physical and developmental information concerning the watersheds and drainage basins of the Commonwealth, including, but not limited to, data relating to land use, soils, hydrology, geology, size of land area being disturbed, proximate water bodies and their characteristics, transportation, and public facilities and services;

Include such survey of lands and waters as may be deemed appropriate by the Board or required by any applicable law to identify areas, including multijurisdictional and watershed areas, with critical erosion and sediment problems; and

Contain conservation standards for various types of soils and land uses, which shall include criteria, techniques, and methods for the control of erosion and sediment resulting from land-disturbing activities.

The Board shall provide technical assistance and advice to, and conduct and supervise educational programs for VESCP authorities.

The Board shall adopt regulations establishing minimum standards of effectiveness of erosion and sediment control programs, and criteria and procedures for reviewing and evaluating the effectiveness of VESCPs. In developing minimum standards for program effectiveness, the Board shall consider information and standards on which the regulations promulgated pursuant to subsection A are based.

The Board shall approve VESCP authorities and shall periodically conduct a comprehensive program compliance review and evaluation to ensure that all VESCPs operating under the jurisdiction of this article meet minimum standards of effectiveness in controlling soil erosion, sediment deposition, and nonagricultural runoff. The Department shall develop a schedule for conducting periodic reviews and evaluations of the effectiveness of VESCPs unless otherwise directed by the Board. Such reviews where applicable shall be coordinated with those being implemented in accordance with the Stormwater Management Act (§

62.1-44.15:24

et seq.) and associated regulations and the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq.) and associated regulations. The Department may also conduct a comprehensive or partial program compliance review and evaluation of a VESCP at a greater frequency than the standard schedule.

The Board shall issue certificates of competence concerning the content, application, and intent of specified subject areas of this article and accompanying regulations, including program administration, plan review, and project inspection, to personnel of program authorities and to any other persons who have completed training programs or in other ways demonstrated adequate knowledge. The Department shall administer education and training programs for specified subject areas of this article and accompanying regulations, and is authorized to charge persons attending such programs reasonable fees to cover the costs of administering the programs. Such education and training programs shall also contain expanded components to address plan review and project inspection elements of the Stormwater Management Act (§

62.1-44.15:24

et seq.) and attendant regulations in accordance with §

62.1-44.15:30

.

Department personnel conducting inspections pursuant to this article shall hold a certificate of competence as provided in subsection E.

History.

1973, c. 486, § 21-89.4; 1988, cc. 732, 891, § 10.1-561; 1993, c. 925; 2004, c. 431; 2005, c. 107; 2006, c. 21; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2015, c. 497; 2016, c. 66.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective until July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect at that time, see the following section, also numbered

62.1-44.15:52

.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 497 inserted “or exempt pursuant to subdivision C 7 of §

62.1-44.15:34

” at the end of the first paragraph of subsection A.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 66, in the introductory paragraph of subsection A, inserted “(a)” and “or time limits on applicability of approved design criteria” and substituted “Regulations, in which case the flow rate capacity and velocity requirements of this subsection shall apply, or (b) are” for “Permit Regulations or” in the last sentence.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Stop work orders. —

Subsection C of § 10.1-566 provides for two distinct orders that may be issued to compel compliance with permit and plan approval requirements: (1) an initial order that applies only to land disturbing activities, and (2) a more restrictive second order encompassing all construction activities that may be issued for noncompliance with the first order. Further, building official lacks the authority to limit the scope of the second order once it is issued. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable James E. Edmunds, II, Member, House of Delegates, 10-052, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 39 (7/30/10).